Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-539
Policy; additional coverage; not covered in term.

Any policy which grants the coverage required for a motor vehicle liability policy may also grant any lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage specified for a motor vehicle liability policy and such excess or additional coverage shall not be subject to the provisions of sections 60-501 to 60-569. With respect to a policy which grants such excess or additional coverage the term motor vehicle liability policy shall apply only to that part of the coverage which is required by sections 60-533 to 60-543.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 39, p. 497.